apertium-bb-en/apertium-bb-en.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

    <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
    <!-- symbols -->
    <sdefs>
	<sdef n="n"/>
	<sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
	<sdef n="det"/>
	<sdef n="pron"/>

	<sdef n="adv"/>
	<sdef n="adv_raw"/>
	<sdef n="adv_plus"/>

	<sdef n="pr"/>
	<sdef n="pos"/>
	<sdef n="sg"/>
	<sdef n="pl"/>
	<sdef n="sp"/>
	<sdef n="def"/>
	<sdef n="num"/>

	<sdef n="v"/>
	<sdef n="vblex"/>
	<sdef n="p1"/>
	<sdef n="p2"/>
	<sdef n="pri"/>

	<sdef n="cm"/>
	<sdef n="percent"/>
	<sdef n="time"/>
	<sdef n="email"/>
    </sdefs>
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="slow__adv">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="adv_raw"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>ly</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="adv_plus"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	

		<pardef n="she__pron">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="pron"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
			<e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="tr/ies__vblex">
			<e><p><l>ies</l><r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>			
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="tr/y__vblex">
			<e><p><l>y</l><r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>			
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="walk/s__vblex">
			<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>			
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="walk__v">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="the__det">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="their__det">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		<pardef n="from__pr">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		<pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		<pardef n="house__n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
		
		<pardef n="bass__n">
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">

<!-- Pronouns -->
		<e lm="she"><i>she</i><par n="she__pron"/></e>	
 
<!-- Articles -->
		<e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
		
<!-- Conjunctions -->

		<e lm="and"><i>and</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="or"><i>or</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="but"><i>but</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>


 <!-- Prepositions -->

		<e lm="from"><i>from</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="to"><i>to</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="on"><i>on</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="with"><i>with</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="under"><i>under</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="through"><i>through</i><par n="from__pr"/></e>
		
	
 <!-- Determiners -->

		<e lm="my"><i>my</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="your"><i>your</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="his"><i>his</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="her"><i>her</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="its"><i>its</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="our"><i>our</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="their"><i>their</i><par n="their__det"/></e>
		<e lm="the"><i>the</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
	  

 <!-- Nouns -->
		

		<e lm="garden"><i>garden</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
		<e lm="table"><i>table</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
		<e lm="chair"><i>chair</i><par n="house__n"/></e>

	
		<e lm="everywhere"><i>everywhere</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
		<e lm="still"><i>still</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
		
		
<!-- Verbs -->
		<e lm="walk"><i>walk</i><par n="walk/s__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="walk"><i>walk</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>

		<e lm="look"><i>look</i><par n="walk/s__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="look"><i>look</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>

		<e lm="find"><i>find</i><par n="walk/s__vblex"/></e>		
		<e lm="find"><i>find</i><par n="walk__v"/></e>		

		<e lm="try"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/ies__vblex"/></e>		
		<e lm="try"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/y__vblex"/></e>	
		<e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<!-- adverbs -->
		<e lm="slow"><i>slow</i><par n="slow__adv"/></e>
		

	</section>

</dictionary>
